Utah statutes.
17-18a-201.   County and district attorney duties.

The duties, functions, and responsibilities of a county attorney or district attorney, acting as a public prosecutor or as civil counsel, are as provided in this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

